src/noun-myv-morph.txt
+LV+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шканзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шканзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шканО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шканО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шканксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шканксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2астсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2астсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шкастсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шкастсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2антьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1шкантьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ela+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1стО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+LV+Ine+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>О1сО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шка%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Def+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>стьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Gen+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Ela+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>стэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Ine+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>сэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Prl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>Г2асе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Comp+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>шкасе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Abe+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>втемесе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Tra+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>кссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Tra+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>ксэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
